Illinois, session 104th, HB5469.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 is 5amended by changing Sections 26, 31.1, and 32.1 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 5/26)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-26)7    Sec. 26. Wagering. 8    (a) Any licensee may conduct and supervise the pari-mutuel 9system of wagering, as defined in Section 3.12 of this Act, on 10horse races conducted by an Illinois organization licensee or 11conducted at a racetrack located in another state or country 12in accordance with subsection (g) of Section 26 of this Act. 13Subject to the prior consent of the Board, licensees may 14supplement any pari-mutuel pool in order to guarantee a 15minimum distribution. Such pari-mutuel method of wagering 16shall not, under any circumstances if conducted under the 17provisions of this Act, be held or construed to be unlawful, 18other statutes of this State to the contrary notwithstanding. 19Subject to rules for advance wagering promulgated by the 20Board, any licensee may accept wagers in advance of the day the 21race wagered upon occurs.22    (b) Except for those gaming activities for which a license 23is obtained and authorized under the Illinois Lottery Law, the   HB5469- 2 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1Charitable Games Act, the Raffles and Poker Runs Act, or the 2Illinois Gambling Act, no other method of betting, pool 3making, wagering or gambling shall be used or permitted by the 4licensee. Each licensee may retain, subject to the payment of 5all applicable taxes and purses, an amount not to exceed 17% of 6all money wagered under subsection (a) of this Section, except 7as may otherwise be permitted under this Act.8    (b-5) An individual may place a wager under the 9pari-mutuel system from any licensed location authorized under 10this Act provided that wager is electronically recorded in the 11manner described in Section 3.12 of this Act. Any wager made 12electronically by an individual while physically on the 13premises of a licensee shall be deemed to have been made at the 14premises of that licensee.15    (c) (Blank).16    (c-5) The sum held by any licensee for payment of 17outstanding pari-mutuel tickets, if unclaimed prior to 18December 31 of the next year, shall be retained by the licensee 19for payment of such tickets until that date. Within 10 days 20thereafter, the balance of such sum remaining unclaimed, less 21any uncashed supplements contributed by such licensee for the 22purpose of guaranteeing minimum distributions of any 23pari-mutuel pool, shall be evenly distributed to the purse 24account of the organization licensee and the organization 25licensee, except that the balance of the sum of all 26outstanding pari-mutuel tickets generated from simulcast   HB5469- 3 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1wagering and inter-track wagering by an organization licensee 2located in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and 3borders the Mississippi River or any licensee that derives its 4license from that organization licensee shall be evenly 5distributed to the purse account of the organization licensee 6and the organization licensee.7    (d) A pari-mutuel ticket shall be honored until December 831 of the next calendar year, and the licensee shall pay the 9same and may charge the amount thereof against unpaid money 10similarly accumulated on account of pari-mutuel tickets not 11presented for payment.12    (e) No licensee shall knowingly permit any minor, other 13than an employee of such licensee or an owner, trainer, 14jockey, driver, or employee thereof, to be admitted during a 15racing program unless accompanied by a parent or guardian, or 16any minor to be a patron of the pari-mutuel system of wagering 17conducted or supervised by it. The admission of any 18unaccompanied minor, other than an employee of the licensee or 19an owner, trainer, jockey, driver, or employee thereof at a 20race track is a Class C misdemeanor.21    (f) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Act, an 22organization licensee may contract with an entity in another 23state or country to permit any legal wagering entity in 24another state or country to accept wagers solely within such 25other state or country on races conducted by the organization 26licensee in this State. Beginning January 1, 2000, these   HB5469- 4 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1wagers shall not be subject to State taxation. Until January 21, 2000, when the out-of-State entity conducts a pari-mutuel 3pool separate from the organization licensee, a privilege tax 4equal to 7 1/2% of all monies received by the organization 5licensee from entities in other states or countries pursuant 6to such contracts is imposed on the organization licensee, and 7such privilege tax shall be remitted to the Department of 8Revenue within 48 hours of receipt of the moneys from the 9simulcast. When the out-of-State entity conducts a combined 10pari-mutuel pool with the organization licensee, the tax shall 11be 10% of all monies received by the organization licensee 12with 25% of the receipts from this 10% tax to be distributed to 13the county in which the race was conducted.14    An organization licensee may permit one or more of its 15races to be utilized for pari-mutuel wagering at one or more 16locations in other states and may transmit audio and visual 17signals of races the organization licensee conducts to one or 18more locations outside the State or country and may also 19permit pari-mutuel pools in other states or countries to be 20combined with its gross or net wagering pools or with wagering 21pools established by other states.22    (g) A host track may accept interstate simulcast wagers on 23horse races conducted in other states or countries and shall 24control the number of signals and types of breeds of racing in 25its simulcast program, subject to the disapproval of the 26Board. The Board may prohibit a simulcast program only if it   HB5469- 5 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1finds that the simulcast program is clearly adverse to the 2integrity of racing. The host track simulcast program shall 3include the signal of live racing of all organization 4licensees. All non-host licensees and advance deposit wagering 5licensees shall carry the signal of and accept wagers on live 6racing of all organization licensees. Advance deposit wagering 7licensees shall not be permitted to accept out-of-state wagers 8on any Illinois signal provided pursuant to this Section 9without the approval and consent of the organization licensee 10providing the signal. For one year after August 15, 2014 (the 11effective date of Public Act 98-968), non-host licensees may 12carry the host track simulcast program and shall accept wagers 13on all races included as part of the simulcast program of horse 14races conducted at race tracks located within North America 15upon which wagering is permitted. For a period of one year 16after August 15, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 1798-968), on horse races conducted at race tracks located 18outside of North America, non-host licensees may accept wagers 19on all races included as part of the simulcast program upon 20which wagering is permitted. Beginning August 15, 2015 (one 21year after the effective date of Public Act 98-968), non-host 22licensees may carry the host track simulcast program and shall 23accept wagers on all races included as part of the simulcast 24program upon which wagering is permitted. All organization 25licensees shall provide their live signal to all advance 26deposit wagering licensees for a simulcast commission fee not   HB5469- 6 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1to exceed 6% of the advance deposit wagering licensee's 2Illinois handle on the organization licensee's signal without 3prior approval by the Board. The Board may adopt rules under 4which it may permit simulcast commission fees in excess of 6%. 5The Board shall adopt rules limiting the interstate commission 6fees charged to an advance deposit wagering licensee. The 7Board shall adopt rules regarding advance deposit wagering on 8interstate simulcast races that shall reflect, among other 9things, the General Assembly's desire to maximize revenues to 10the State, horsemen purses, and organization licensees. 11However, organization licensees providing live signals 12pursuant to the requirements of this subsection (g) may 13petition the Board to withhold their live signals from an 14advance deposit wagering licensee if the organization licensee 15discovers and the Board finds reputable or credible 16information that the advance deposit wagering licensee is 17under investigation by another state or federal governmental 18agency, the advance deposit wagering licensee's license has 19been suspended in another state, or the advance deposit 20wagering licensee's license is in revocation proceedings in 21another state. The organization licensee's provision of their 22live signal to an advance deposit wagering licensee under this 23subsection (g) pertains to wagers placed from within Illinois. 24Advance deposit wagering licensees may place advance deposit 25wagering terminals at wagering facilities as a convenience to 26customers. The advance deposit wagering licensee shall not   HB5469- 7 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1charge or collect any fee from purses for the placement of the 2advance deposit wagering terminals. The costs and expenses of 3the host track and non-host licensees associated with 4interstate simulcast wagering, other than the interstate 5commission fee, shall be borne by the host track and all 6non-host licensees incurring these costs. The interstate 7commission fee shall not exceed 5% of Illinois handle on the 8interstate simulcast race or races without prior approval of 9the Board. The Board shall promulgate rules under which it may 10permit interstate commission fees in excess of 5%. The 11interstate commission fee and other fees charged by the 12sending racetrack, including, but not limited to, satellite 13decoder fees, shall be uniformly applied to the host track and 14all non-host licensees.15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, an 16organization licensee, with the consent of the horsemen 17association representing the largest number of owners, 18trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race horses at 19that organization licensee's racing meeting, may maintain a 20system whereby advance deposit wagering may take place or an 21organization licensee, with the consent of the horsemen 22association representing the largest number of owners, 23trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race horses at 24that organization licensee's racing meeting, may contract with 25another person to carry out a system of advance deposit 26wagering. Such consent may not be unreasonably withheld. Only   HB5469- 8 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1with respect to an appeal to the Board that consent for an 2organization licensee that maintains its own advance deposit 3wagering system is being unreasonably withheld, the Board 4shall issue a final order within 30 days after initiation of 5the appeal, and the organization licensee's advance deposit 6wagering system may remain operational during that 30-day 7period. The actions of any organization licensee who conducts 8advance deposit wagering or any person who has a contract with 9an organization licensee to conduct advance deposit wagering 10who conducts advance deposit wagering on or after January 1, 112013 and prior to June 7, 2013 (the effective date of Public 12Act 98-18) taken in reliance on the changes made to this 13subsection (g) by Public Act 98-18 are hereby validated, 14provided payment of all applicable pari-mutuel taxes are 15remitted to the Board. All advance deposit wagers placed from 16within Illinois must be placed through a Board-approved 17advance deposit wagering licensee; no other entity may accept 18an advance deposit wager from a person within Illinois. All 19advance deposit wagering is subject to any rules adopted by 20the Board. The Board may adopt rules necessary to regulate 21advance deposit wagering through the use of emergency 22rulemaking in accordance with Section 5-45 of the Illinois 23Administrative Procedure Act. The General Assembly finds that 24the adoption of rules to regulate advance deposit wagering is 25deemed an emergency and necessary for the public interest, 26safety, and welfare. An advance deposit wagering licensee may   HB5469- 9 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1retain all moneys as agreed to by contract with an 2organization licensee. Any moneys retained by the organization 3licensee from advance deposit wagering, not including moneys 4retained by the advance deposit wagering licensee, shall be 5paid 50% to the organization licensee's purse account and 50% 6to the organization licensee. With the exception of any 7organization licensee that is owned by a publicly traded 8company that is incorporated in a state other than Illinois 9and advance deposit wagering licensees under contract with 10such organization licensees, organization licensees that 11maintain advance deposit wagering systems and advance deposit 12wagering licensees that contract with organization licensees 13shall provide sufficiently detailed monthly accountings to the 14horsemen association representing the largest number of 15owners, trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race 16horses at that organization licensee's racing meeting so that 17the horsemen association, as an interested party, can confirm 18the accuracy of the amounts paid to the purse account at the 19horsemen association's affiliated organization licensee from 20advance deposit wagering. If more than one breed races at the 21same race track facility, then the 50% of the moneys to be paid 22to an organization licensee's purse account shall be allocated 23among all organization licensees' purse accounts operating at 24that race track facility proportionately based on the actual 25number of host days that the Board grants to that breed at that 26race track facility in the current calendar year. To the   HB5469- 10 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1extent any fees from advance deposit wagering conducted in 2Illinois for wagers in Illinois or other states have been 3placed in escrow or otherwise withheld from wagers pending a 4determination of the legality of advance deposit wagering, no 5action shall be brought to declare such wagers or the 6disbursement of any fees previously escrowed illegal.7        (1) Between the hours of 6:30 a.m. and 6:30 p.m. an 8    inter-track wagering licensee other than the host track 9    may supplement the host track simulcast program with 10    additional simulcast races or race programs, provided that 11    between January 1 and the third Friday in February of any 12    year, inclusive, if no live thoroughbred racing is 13    occurring in Illinois during this period, only 14    thoroughbred races may be used for supplemental interstate 15    simulcast purposes. The Board shall withhold approval for 16    a supplemental interstate simulcast only if it finds that 17    the simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of 18    racing. A supplemental interstate simulcast may be 19    transmitted from an inter-track wagering licensee to its 20    affiliated non-host licensees. The interstate commission 21    fee for a supplemental interstate simulcast shall be paid 22    by the non-host licensee and its affiliated non-host 23    licensees receiving the simulcast.24        (2) Between the hours of 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m. an 25    inter-track wagering licensee other than the host track 26    may receive supplemental interstate simulcasts only with   HB5469- 11 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    the consent of the host track, except when the Board finds 2    that the simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of 3    racing. Consent granted under this paragraph (2) to any 4    inter-track wagering licensee shall be deemed consent to 5    all non-host licensees. The interstate commission fee for 6    the supplemental interstate simulcast shall be paid by all 7    participating non-host licensees.8        (3) Each licensee conducting interstate simulcast 9    wagering may retain, subject to the payment of all 10    applicable taxes and the purses, an amount not to exceed 11    17% of all money wagered. If any licensee conducts the 12    pari-mutuel system wagering on races conducted at 13    racetracks in another state or country, each such race or 14    race program shall be considered a separate racing day for 15    the purpose of determining the daily handle and computing 16    the privilege tax of that daily handle as provided in 17    subsection (a) of Section 27. Until January 1, 2000, from 18    the sums permitted to be retained pursuant to this 19    subsection, each inter-track wagering location licensee 20    shall pay 1% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered on 21    simulcast wagering to the Horse Racing Tax Allocation 22    Fund, subject to the provisions of subparagraph (B) of 23    paragraph (11) of subsection (h) of Section 26 of this 24    Act.25        (4) A licensee who receives an interstate simulcast 26    may combine its gross or net pools with pools at the   HB5469- 12 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    sending racetracks pursuant to rules established by the 2    Board. All licensees combining their gross pools at a 3    sending racetrack shall adopt the takeout percentages of 4    the sending racetrack. A licensee may also establish a 5    separate pool and takeout structure for wagering purposes 6    on races conducted at race tracks outside of the State of 7    Illinois. The licensee may permit pari-mutuel wagers 8    placed in other states or countries to be combined with 9    its gross or net wagering pools or other wagering pools.10        (5) After the payment of the interstate commission fee 11    (except for the interstate commission fee on a 12    supplemental interstate simulcast, which shall be paid by 13    the host track and by each non-host licensee through the 14    host track) and all applicable State and local taxes, 15    except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 27 of this 16    Act, the remainder of moneys retained from simulcast 17    wagering pursuant to this subsection (g), and Section 26.2 18    shall be divided as follows:19            (A) For interstate simulcast wagers made at a host 20        track, 50% to the host track and 50% to purses at the 21        host track.22            (B) For wagers placed on interstate simulcast 23        races, supplemental simulcasts as defined in 24        subparagraphs (1) and (2), and separately pooled races 25        conducted outside of the State of Illinois made at a 26        non-host licensee, 25% to the host track, 25% to the   HB5469- 13 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        non-host licensee, and 50% to the purses at the host 2        track.3        (6) Notwithstanding any provision in this Act to the 4    contrary, non-host licensees who derive their licenses 5    from a track located in a county with a population in 6    excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River 7    may receive supplemental interstate simulcast races at all 8    times subject to Board approval, which shall be withheld 9    only upon a finding that a supplemental interstate 10    simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of racing.11        (7) Effective January 1, 2017, notwithstanding any 12    provision of this Act to the contrary, after payment of 13    all applicable State and local taxes and interstate 14    commission fees, non-host licensees who derive their 15    licenses from a track located in a county with a 16    population in excess of 230,000 and that borders the 17    Mississippi River shall retain 50% of the retention from 18    interstate simulcast wagers and shall pay 50% to purses at 19    the track from which the non-host licensee derives its 20    license.21        (7.1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act 22    to the contrary, if no standardbred racing is conducted at 23    a racetrack located in Madison County during any calendar 24    year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, and the 25    licensee that conducts horse racing at that racetrack 26    requests from the Board at least as many racing dates as   HB5469- 14 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    were conducted in calendar year 2000, all moneys derived 2    by that racetrack from simulcast wagering and inter-track 3    wagering that (1) are to be used for purses and (2) are 4    generated between the hours of 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m. 5    during that calendar year shall be paid as follows:6            (A) Eighty percent shall be paid to its 7        thoroughbred purse account; and8            (B) Twenty percent shall be deposited into the 9        Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund and shall 10        be paid to purses for standardbred races for Illinois 11        conceived and foaled horses conducted at any county 12        fairgrounds. The moneys deposited into the Fund 13        pursuant to this subparagraph (B) shall be deposited 14        within 2 weeks after the day they were generated, 15        shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other 16        moneys paid to standardbred purses under this Act, and 17        shall not be commingled with other moneys paid into 18        that Fund. The moneys deposited pursuant to this 19        subparagraph (B) shall be allocated as provided by the 20        Department of Agriculture, with the advice and 21        assistance of the Illinois Standardbred Breeders Fund 22        Advisory Board.23        (7.2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act 24    to the contrary, if no thoroughbred racing is conducted at 25    a racetrack located in Madison County during any calendar 26    year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, and the   HB5469- 15 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    licensee that conducts horse racing at that racetrack 2    requests from the Board at least as many racing dates as 3    were conducted in calendar year 2000, all moneys derived 4    by that racetrack from simulcast wagering and inter-track 5    wagering that (1) are to be used for purses and (2) are 6    generated between the hours of 6:30 a.m. and 6:30 p.m. 7    during that calendar year shall be deposited as follows:8            (A) Eighty percent shall be deposited into its 9        standardbred purse account; and10            (B) Twenty percent shall be deposited into the 11        Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund. Moneys 12        deposited into the Illinois Colt Stakes Purse 13        Distribution Fund pursuant to this subparagraph (B) 14        shall be paid to Illinois conceived and foaled 15        thoroughbred breeders' programs and to thoroughbred 16        purses for races conducted at any county fairgrounds 17        for Illinois conceived and foaled horses at the 18        discretion of the Department of Agriculture, with the 19        advice and assistance of the Illinois Thoroughbred 20        Breeders Fund Advisory Board. The moneys deposited 21        into the Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund 22        pursuant to this subparagraph (B) shall be deposited 23        within 2 weeks after the day they were generated, 24        shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other 25        moneys paid to thoroughbred purses under this Act, and 26        shall not be commingled with other moneys deposited   HB5469- 16 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        into that Fund.2        (8) Notwithstanding any provision in this Act to the 3    contrary, an organization licensee from a track located in 4    a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and that 5    borders the Mississippi River and its affiliated non-host 6    licensees shall not be entitled to share in any retention 7    generated on racing, inter-track wagering, or simulcast 8    wagering at any other Illinois wagering facility.9        (8.1) Notwithstanding any provisions in this Act to 10    the contrary, if 2 organization licensees are conducting 11    standardbred race meetings concurrently between the hours 12    of 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m., after payment of all 13    applicable State and local taxes and interstate commission 14    fees, the remainder of the amount retained from simulcast 15    wagering otherwise attributable to the host track and to 16    host track purses shall be split daily between the 2 17    organization licensees and the purses at the tracks of the 18    2 organization licensees, respectively, based on each 19    organization licensee's share of the total live handle for 20    that day, provided that this provision shall not apply to 21    any non-host licensee that derives its license from a 22    track located in a county with a population in excess of 23    230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River.24        (9) (Blank).25        (10) (Blank).26        (11) (Blank).  HB5469- 17 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        (12) The Board shall have authority to compel all host 2    tracks to receive the simulcast of any or all races 3    conducted at the Springfield or DuQuoin State fairgrounds 4    and include all such races as part of their simulcast 5    programs.6        (13) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, 7    in the event that the total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 8    Illinois horse races at all wagering facilities in any 9    calendar year is less than 75% of the total Illinois 10    pari-mutuel handle on Illinois horse races at all such 11    wagering facilities for calendar year 1994, then each 12    wagering facility that has an annual total Illinois 13    pari-mutuel handle on Illinois horse races that is less 14    than 75% of the total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 15    Illinois horse races at such wagering facility for 16    calendar year 1994, shall be permitted to receive, from 17    any amount otherwise payable to the purse account at the 18    race track with which the wagering facility is affiliated 19    in the succeeding calendar year, an amount equal to 2% of 20    the differential in total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 21    Illinois horse races at the wagering facility between that 22    calendar year in question and 1994 provided, however, that 23    a wagering facility shall not be entitled to any such 24    payment until the Board certifies in writing to the 25    wagering facility the amount to which the wagering 26    facility is entitled and a schedule for payment of the   HB5469- 18 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    amount to the wagering facility, based on: (i) the racing 2    dates awarded to the race track affiliated with the 3    wagering facility during the succeeding year; (ii) the 4    sums available or anticipated to be available in the purse 5    account of the race track affiliated with the wagering 6    facility for purses during the succeeding year; and (iii) 7    the need to ensure reasonable purse levels during the 8    payment period. The Board's certification shall be 9    provided no later than January 31 of the succeeding year. 10    In the event a wagering facility entitled to a payment 11    under this paragraph (13) is affiliated with a race track 12    that maintains purse accounts for both standardbred and 13    thoroughbred racing, the amount to be paid to the wagering 14    facility shall be divided between each purse account pro 15    rata, based on the amount of Illinois handle on Illinois 16    standardbred and thoroughbred racing respectively at the 17    wagering facility during the previous calendar year. 18    Annually, the General Assembly shall appropriate 19    sufficient funds from the General Revenue Fund to the 20    Department of Agriculture for payment into the 21    thoroughbred and standardbred horse racing purse accounts 22    at Illinois pari-mutuel tracks. The amount paid to each 23    purse account shall be the amount certified by the 24    Illinois Racing Board in January to be transferred from 25    each account to each eligible racing facility in 26    accordance with the provisions of this Section. In   HB5469- 19 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    addition to the annual appropriation, the General Assembly 2    shall make a one-time appropriation for the 3-year period 3    before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 4    104th General Assembly for which appropriations were not 5    made. Beginning in the calendar year in which an 6    organization licensee that is eligible to receive payment 7    under this paragraph (13) begins to receive funds from 8    gaming pursuant to an organization gaming license issued 9    under the Illinois Gambling Act, the amount of the payment 10    due to all wagering facilities licensed under that 11    organization licensee under this paragraph (13) shall be 12    the amount certified by the Board in January of that year. 13    An organization licensee and its related wagering 14    facilities shall no longer be able to receive payments 15    under this paragraph (13) beginning in the year subsequent 16    to the fifth first year in which the organization licensee 17    begins to receive funds from gaming pursuant to an 18    organization gaming license issued under the Illinois 19    Gambling Act.20    (h) The Board may approve and license the conduct of 21inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering by inter-track 22wagering licensees and inter-track wagering location licensees 23subject to the following terms and conditions:24        (1) Any person licensed to conduct a race meeting (i) 25    at a track where 60 or more days of racing were conducted 26    during the immediately preceding calendar year or where   HB5469- 20 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    over the 5 immediately preceding calendar years an average 2    of 30 or more days of racing were conducted annually may be 3    issued an inter-track wagering license; (ii) at a track 4    located in a county that is bounded by the Mississippi 5    River, which has a population of less than 150,000 6    according to the 1990 decennial census, and an average of 7    at least 60 days of racing per year between 1985 and 1993 8    may be issued an inter-track wagering license; (iii) at a 9    track awarded standardbred racing dates; or (iv) at a 10    track located in Madison County that conducted at least 11    100 days of live racing during the immediately preceding 12    calendar year may be issued an inter-track wagering 13    license, unless a lesser schedule of live racing is the 14    result of (A) weather, unsafe track conditions, or other 15    acts of God; (B) an agreement between the organization 16    licensee and the associations representing the largest 17    number of owners, trainers, jockeys, or standardbred 18    drivers who race horses at that organization licensee's 19    racing meeting; or (C) a finding by the Board of 20    extraordinary circumstances and that it was in the best 21    interest of the public and the sport to conduct fewer than 22    100 days of live racing. Any such person having operating 23    control of the racing facility may receive inter-track 24    wagering location licenses. An eligible race track located 25    in a county that has a population of more than 230,000 and 26    that is bounded by the Mississippi River may establish up   HB5469- 21 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    to 9 inter-track wagering locations, an eligible race 2    track located in Stickney Township in Cook County may 3    establish up to 16 inter-track wagering locations, and an 4    eligible race track located in Palatine Township in Cook 5    County may establish up to 18 inter-track wagering 6    locations. An eligible racetrack conducting standardbred 7    racing may have up to 16 inter-track wagering locations. 8    An application for said license shall be filed with the 9    Board prior to such dates as may be fixed by the Board. 10    With an application for an inter-track wagering location 11    license there shall be delivered to the Board a certified 12    check or bank draft payable to the order of the Board for 13    an amount equal to $500. The application shall be on forms 14    prescribed and furnished by the Board. The application 15    shall comply with all other rules, regulations and 16    conditions imposed by the Board in connection therewith.17        (2) The Board shall examine the applications with 18    respect to their conformity with this Act and the rules 19    and regulations imposed by the Board. If found to be in 20    compliance with the Act and rules and regulations of the 21    Board, the Board may then issue a license to conduct 22    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering to such 23    applicant. All such applications shall be acted upon by 24    the Board at a meeting to be held on such date as may be 25    fixed by the Board.26        (3) In granting licenses to conduct inter-track   HB5469- 22 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    wagering and simulcast wagering, the Board shall give due 2    consideration to the best interests of the public, of 3    horse racing, and of maximizing revenue to the State.4        (4) Prior to the issuance of a license to conduct 5    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering, the applicant 6    shall file with the Board a bond payable to the State of 7    Illinois in the sum of $50,000, executed by the applicant 8    and a surety company or companies authorized to do 9    business in this State, and conditioned upon (i) the 10    payment by the licensee of all taxes due under Section 27 11    or 27.1 and any other monies due and payable under this 12    Act, and (ii) distribution by the licensee, upon 13    presentation of the winning ticket or tickets, of all sums 14    payable to the patrons of pari-mutuel pools.15        (5) Each license to conduct inter-track wagering and 16    simulcast wagering shall specify the person to whom it is 17    issued, the dates on which such wagering is permitted, and 18    the track or location where the wagering is to be 19    conducted.20        (6) All wagering under such license is subject to this 21    Act and to the rules and regulations from time to time 22    prescribed by the Board, and every such license issued by 23    the Board shall contain a recital to that effect.24        (7) An inter-track wagering licensee or inter-track 25    wagering location licensee may accept wagers at the track 26    or location where it is licensed, or as otherwise provided   HB5469- 23 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    under this Act.2        (8) Inter-track wagering or simulcast wagering shall 3    not be conducted at any track less than 4 miles from a 4    track at which a racing meeting is in progress.5        (8.1) Inter-track wagering location licensees who 6    derive their licenses from a particular organization 7    licensee shall conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast 8    wagering only at locations that are within 160 miles of 9    that race track where the particular organization licensee 10    is licensed to conduct racing. However, inter-track 11    wagering and simulcast wagering shall not be conducted by 12    those licensees at any location within 5 miles of any race 13    track at which a horse race meeting has been licensed in 14    the current year, unless the person having operating 15    control of such race track has given its written consent 16    to such inter-track wagering location licensees, which 17    consent must be filed with the Board at or prior to the 18    time application is made. In the case of any inter-track 19    wagering location licensee initially licensed after 20    December 31, 2013, inter-track wagering and simulcast 21    wagering shall not be conducted by those inter-track 22    wagering location licensees that are located outside the 23    City of Chicago at any location within 8 miles of any race 24    track at which a horse race meeting has been licensed in 25    the current year, unless the person having operating 26    control of such race track has given its written consent   HB5469- 24 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    to such inter-track wagering location licensees, which 2    consent must be filed with the Board at or prior to the 3    time application is made. 4        (8.2) Inter-track wagering or simulcast wagering shall 5    not be conducted by an inter-track wagering location 6    licensee at any location within 100 feet of an existing 7    church, an existing elementary or secondary public school, 8    or an existing elementary or secondary private school 9    registered with or recognized by the State Board of 10    Education. The distance of 100 feet shall be measured to 11    the nearest part of any building used for worship 12    services, education programs, or conducting inter-track 13    wagering by an inter-track wagering location licensee, and 14    not to property boundaries. However, inter-track wagering 15    or simulcast wagering may be conducted at a site within 16    100 feet of a church or school if such church or school has 17    been erected or established after the Board issues the 18    original inter-track wagering location license at the site 19    in question. Inter-track wagering location licensees may 20    conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering only 21    in areas that are zoned for commercial or manufacturing 22    purposes or in areas for which a special use has been 23    approved by the local zoning authority. However, no 24    license to conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast 25    wagering shall be granted by the Board with respect to any 26    inter-track wagering location within the jurisdiction of   HB5469- 25 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    any local zoning authority which has, by ordinance or by 2    resolution, prohibited the establishment of an inter-track 3    wagering location within its jurisdiction. However, 4    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering may be 5    conducted at a site if such ordinance or resolution is 6    enacted after the Board licenses the original inter-track 7    wagering location licensee for the site in question.8        (9) (Blank).9        (10) An inter-track wagering licensee or an 10    inter-track wagering location licensee may retain, subject 11    to the payment of the privilege taxes and the purses, an 12    amount not to exceed 17% of all money wagered. Each 13    program of racing conducted by each inter-track wagering 14    licensee or inter-track wagering location licensee shall 15    be considered a separate racing day for the purpose of 16    determining the daily handle and computing the privilege 17    tax or pari-mutuel tax on such daily handle as provided in 18    Section 27.19        (10.1) Except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 20    27 of this Act, inter-track wagering location licensees 21    shall pay 1% of the pari-mutuel handle at each location to 22    the municipality in which such location is situated and 1% 23    of the pari-mutuel handle at each location to the county 24    in which such location is situated. In the event that an 25    inter-track wagering location licensee is situated in an 26    unincorporated area of a county, such licensee shall pay   HB5469- 26 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    2% of the pari-mutuel handle from such location to such 2    county. Inter-track wagering location licensees must pay 3    the handle percentage required under this paragraph to the 4    municipality and county no later than the 20th of the 5    month following the month such handle was generated.6        (10.2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 7    Act, with respect to inter-track wagering at a race track 8    located in a county that has a population of more than 9    230,000 and that is bounded by the Mississippi River ("the 10    first race track"), or at a facility operated by an 11    inter-track wagering licensee or inter-track wagering 12    location licensee that derives its license from the 13    organization licensee that operates the first race track, 14    on races conducted at the first race track or on races 15    conducted at another Illinois race track and 16    simultaneously televised to the first race track or to a 17    facility operated by an inter-track wagering licensee or 18    inter-track wagering location licensee that derives its 19    license from the organization licensee that operates the 20    first race track, those moneys shall be allocated as 21    follows:22            (A) That portion of all moneys wagered on 23        standardbred racing that is required under this Act to 24        be paid to purses shall be paid to purses for 25        standardbred races.26            (B) That portion of all moneys wagered on   HB5469- 27 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        thoroughbred racing that is required under this Act to 2        be paid to purses shall be paid to purses for 3        thoroughbred races.4        (11) (A) After payment of the privilege or pari-mutuel 5    tax, any other applicable taxes, and the costs and 6    expenses in connection with the gathering, transmission, 7    and dissemination of all data necessary to the conduct of 8    inter-track wagering, the remainder of the monies retained 9    under either Section 26 or Section 26.2 of this Act by the 10    inter-track wagering licensee on inter-track wagering 11    shall be allocated with 50% to be split between the 2 12    participating licensees and 50% to purses, except that an 13    inter-track wagering licensee that derives its license 14    from a track located in a county with a population in 15    excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River 16    shall not divide any remaining retention with the Illinois 17    organization licensee that provides the race or races, and 18    an inter-track wagering licensee that accepts wagers on 19    races conducted by an organization licensee that conducts 20    a race meet in a county with a population in excess of 21    230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River shall not 22    divide any remaining retention with that organization 23    licensee.24        (B) From the sums permitted to be retained pursuant to 25    this Act each inter-track wagering location licensee shall 26    pay (i) the privilege or pari-mutuel tax to the State;   HB5469- 28 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    (ii) 4.75% of the pari-mutuel handle on inter-track 2    wagering at such location on races as purses, except that 3    an inter-track wagering location licensee that derives its 4    license from a track located in a county with a population 5    in excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi 6    River shall retain all purse moneys for its own purse 7    account consistent with distribution set forth in this 8    subsection (h), and inter-track wagering location 9    licensees that accept wagers on races conducted by an 10    organization licensee located in a county with a 11    population in excess of 230,000 and that borders the 12    Mississippi River shall distribute all purse moneys to 13    purses at the operating host track; (iii) until January 1, 14    2000, except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 27 15    of this Act, 1% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered on 16    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering at each 17    inter-track wagering location licensee facility to the 18    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund, provided that, to the 19    extent the total amount collected and distributed to the 20    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund under this subsection (h) 21    during any calendar year exceeds the amount collected and 22    distributed to the Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund during 23    calendar year 1994, that excess amount shall be 24    redistributed (I) to all inter-track wagering location 25    licensees, based on each licensee's pro rata share of the 26    total handle from inter-track wagering and simulcast   HB5469- 29 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    wagering for all inter-track wagering location licensees 2    during the calendar year in which this provision is 3    applicable; then (II) the amounts redistributed to each 4    inter-track wagering location licensee as described in 5    subpart (I) shall be further redistributed as provided in 6    subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subsection (g) of 7    this Section 26 provided first, that the shares of those 8    amounts, which are to be redistributed to the host track 9    or to purses at the host track under subparagraph (B) of 10    paragraph (5) of subsection (g) of this Section 26 shall 11    be redistributed based on each host track's pro rata share 12    of the total inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering 13    handle at all host tracks during the calendar year in 14    question, and second, that any amounts redistributed as 15    described in part (I) to an inter-track wagering location 16    licensee that accepts wagers on races conducted by an 17    organization licensee that conducts a race meet in a 18    county with a population in excess of 230,000 and that 19    borders the Mississippi River shall be further 20    redistributed, effective January 1, 2017, as provided in 21    paragraph (7) of subsection (g) of this Section 26, with 22    the portion of that further redistribution allocated to 23    purses at that organization licensee to be divided between 24    standardbred purses and thoroughbred purses based on the 25    amounts otherwise allocated to purses at that organization 26    licensee during the calendar year in question; and (iv) 8%   HB5469- 30 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    of the pari-mutuel handle on inter-track wagering wagered 2    at such location to satisfy all costs and expenses of 3    conducting its wagering. The remainder of the monies 4    retained by the inter-track wagering location licensee 5    shall be allocated 40% to the location licensee and 60% to 6    the organization licensee which provides the Illinois 7    races to the location, except that an inter-track wagering 8    location licensee that derives its license from a track 9    located in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 10    and that borders the Mississippi River shall not divide 11    any remaining retention with the organization licensee 12    that provides the race or races and an inter-track 13    wagering location licensee that accepts wagers on races 14    conducted by an organization licensee that conducts a race 15    meet in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and 16    that borders the Mississippi River shall not divide any 17    remaining retention with the organization licensee. 18    Notwithstanding the provisions of clauses (ii) and (iv) of 19    this paragraph, in the case of the additional inter-track 20    wagering location licenses authorized under paragraph (1) 21    of this subsection (h) by Public Act 87-110, those 22    licensees shall pay the following amounts as purses: 23    during the first 12 months the licensee is in operation, 24    5.25% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered at the location on 25    races; during the second 12 months, 5.25%; during the 26    third 12 months, 5.75%; during the fourth 12 months,   HB5469- 31 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    6.25%; and during the fifth 12 months and thereafter, 2    6.75%. The following amounts shall be retained by the 3    licensee to satisfy all costs and expenses of conducting 4    its wagering: during the first 12 months the licensee is 5    in operation, 8.25% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered at 6    the location; during the second 12 months, 8.25%; during 7    the third 12 months, 7.75%; during the fourth 12 months, 8    7.25%; and during the fifth 12 months and thereafter, 9    6.75%. For additional inter-track wagering location 10    licensees authorized under Public Act 89-16, purses for 11    the first 12 months the licensee is in operation shall be 12    5.75% of the pari-mutuel wagered at the location, purses 13    for the second 12 months the licensee is in operation 14    shall be 6.25%, and purses thereafter shall be 6.75%. For 15    additional inter-track location licensees authorized under 16    Public Act 89-16, the licensee shall be allowed to retain 17    to satisfy all costs and expenses: 7.75% of the 18    pari-mutuel handle wagered at the location during its 19    first 12 months of operation, 7.25% during its second 12 20    months of operation, and 6.75% thereafter.21        (C) There is hereby created the Horse Racing Tax 22    Allocation Fund which shall remain in existence until 23    December 31, 1999. Moneys remaining in the Fund after 24    December 31, 1999 shall be paid into the General Revenue 25    Fund. Until January 1, 2000, all monies paid into the 26    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund pursuant to this   HB5469- 32 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    paragraph (11) by inter-track wagering location licensees 2    located in park districts of 500,000 population or less, 3    or in a municipality that is not included within any park 4    district but is included within a conservation district 5    and is the county seat of a county that (i) is contiguous 6    to the state of Indiana and (ii) has a 1990 population of 7    88,257 according to the United States Bureau of the 8    Census, and operating on May 1, 1994 shall be allocated by 9    appropriation as follows:10            Two-sevenths to the Department of Agriculture. 11        Fifty percent of this two-sevenths shall be used to 12        promote the Illinois horse racing and breeding 13        industry, and shall be distributed by the Department 14        of Agriculture upon the advice of a 9-member committee 15        appointed by the Governor consisting of the following 16        members: the Director of Agriculture, who shall serve 17        as chairman; 2 representatives of organization 18        licensees conducting thoroughbred race meetings in 19        this State, recommended by those licensees; 2 20        representatives of organization licensees conducting 21        standardbred race meetings in this State, recommended 22        by those licensees; a representative of the Illinois 23        Thoroughbred Breeders and Owners Foundation, 24        recommended by that Foundation; a representative of 25        the Illinois Standardbred Owners and Breeders 26        Association, recommended by that Association; a   HB5469- 33 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        representative of the Horsemen's Benevolent and 2        Protective Association or any successor organization 3        thereto established in Illinois comprised of the 4        largest number of owners and trainers, recommended by 5        that Association or that successor organization; and a 6        representative of the Illinois Harness Horsemen's 7        Association, recommended by that Association. 8        Committee members shall serve for terms of 2 years, 9        commencing January 1 of each even-numbered year. If a 10        representative of any of the above-named entities has 11        not been recommended by January 1 of any even-numbered 12        year, the Governor shall appoint a committee member to 13        fill that position. Committee members shall receive no 14        compensation for their services as members but shall 15        be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses 16        and disbursements incurred in the performance of their 17        official duties. The remaining 50% of this 18        two-sevenths shall be distributed to county fairs for 19        premiums and rehabilitation as set forth in the 20        Agricultural Fair Act;21            Four-sevenths to park districts or municipalities 22        that do not have a park district of 500,000 population 23        or less for museum purposes (if an inter-track 24        wagering location licensee is located in such a park 25        district) or to conservation districts for museum 26        purposes (if an inter-track wagering location licensee   HB5469- 34 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        is located in a municipality that is not included 2        within any park district but is included within a 3        conservation district and is the county seat of a 4        county that (i) is contiguous to the state of Indiana 5        and (ii) has a 1990 population of 88,257 according to 6        the United States Bureau of the Census, except that if 7        the conservation district does not maintain a museum, 8        the monies shall be allocated equally between the 9        county and the municipality in which the inter-track 10        wagering location licensee is located for general 11        purposes) or to a municipal recreation board for park 12        purposes (if an inter-track wagering location licensee 13        is located in a municipality that is not included 14        within any park district and park maintenance is the 15        function of the municipal recreation board and the 16        municipality has a 1990 population of 9,302 according 17        to the United States Bureau of the Census); provided 18        that the monies are distributed to each park district 19        or conservation district or municipality that does not 20        have a park district in an amount equal to 21        four-sevenths of the amount collected by each 22        inter-track wagering location licensee within the park 23        district or conservation district or municipality for 24        the Fund. Monies that were paid into the Horse Racing 25        Tax Allocation Fund before August 9, 1991 (the 26        effective date of Public Act 87-110) by an inter-track   HB5469- 35 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        wagering location licensee located in a municipality 2        that is not included within any park district but is 3        included within a conservation district as provided in 4        this paragraph shall, as soon as practicable after 5        August 9, 1991 (the effective date of Public Act 6        87-110), be allocated and paid to that conservation 7        district as provided in this paragraph. Any park 8        district or municipality not maintaining a museum may 9        deposit the monies in the corporate fund of the park 10        district or municipality where the inter-track 11        wagering location is located, to be used for general 12        purposes; and13            One-seventh to the Agricultural Premium Fund to be 14        used for distribution to agricultural home economics 15        extension councils in accordance with "An Act in 16        relation to additional support and finances for the 17        Agricultural and Home Economic Extension Councils in 18        the several counties of this State and making an 19        appropriation therefor", approved July 24, 1967.20        Until January 1, 2000, all other monies paid into the 21    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund pursuant to this 22    paragraph (11) shall be allocated by appropriation as 23    follows:24            Two-sevenths to the Department of Agriculture. 25        Fifty percent of this two-sevenths shall be used to 26        promote the Illinois horse racing and breeding   HB5469- 36 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        industry, and shall be distributed by the Department 2        of Agriculture upon the advice of a 9-member committee 3        appointed by the Governor consisting of the following 4        members: the Director of Agriculture, who shall serve 5        as chairman; 2 representatives of organization 6        licensees conducting thoroughbred race meetings in 7        this State, recommended by those licensees; 2 8        representatives of organization licensees conducting 9        standardbred race meetings in this State, recommended 10        by those licensees; a representative of the Illinois 11        Thoroughbred Breeders and Owners Foundation, 12        recommended by that Foundation; a representative of 13        the Illinois Standardbred Owners and Breeders 14        Association, recommended by that Association; a 15        representative of the Horsemen's Benevolent and 16        Protective Association or any successor organization 17        thereto established in Illinois comprised of the 18        largest number of owners and trainers, recommended by 19        that Association or that successor organization; and a 20        representative of the Illinois Harness Horsemen's 21        Association, recommended by that Association. 22        Committee members shall serve for terms of 2 years, 23        commencing January 1 of each even-numbered year. If a 24        representative of any of the above-named entities has 25        not been recommended by January 1 of any even-numbered 26        year, the Governor shall appoint a committee member to   HB5469- 37 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        fill that position. Committee members shall receive no 2        compensation for their services as members but shall 3        be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses 4        and disbursements incurred in the performance of their 5        official duties. The remaining 50% of this 6        two-sevenths shall be distributed to county fairs for 7        premiums and rehabilitation as set forth in the 8        Agricultural Fair Act;9            Four-sevenths to museums and aquariums located in 10        park districts of over 500,000 population; provided 11        that the monies are distributed in accordance with the 12        previous year's distribution of the maintenance tax 13        for such museums and aquariums as provided in Section 14        2 of the Park District Aquarium and Museum Act; and15            One-seventh to the Agricultural Premium Fund to be 16        used for distribution to agricultural home economics 17        extension councils in accordance with "An Act in 18        relation to additional support and finances for the 19        Agricultural and Home Economic Extension Councils in 20        the several counties of this State and making an 21        appropriation therefor", approved July 24, 1967. This 22        subparagraph (C) shall be inoperative and of no force 23        and effect on and after January 1, 2000.24            (D) Except as provided in paragraph (11) of this 25        subsection (h), with respect to purse allocation from 26        inter-track wagering, the monies so retained shall be   HB5469- 38 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        divided as follows:2                (i) If the inter-track wagering licensee, 3            except an inter-track wagering licensee that 4            derives its license from an organization licensee 5            located in a county with a population in excess of 6            230,000 and bounded by the Mississippi River, is 7            not conducting its own race meeting during the 8            same dates, then the entire purse allocation shall 9            be to purses at the track where the races wagered 10            on are being conducted.11                (ii) If the inter-track wagering licensee, 12            except an inter-track wagering licensee that 13            derives its license from an organization licensee 14            located in a county with a population in excess of 15            230,000 and bounded by the Mississippi River, is 16            also conducting its own race meeting during the 17            same dates, then the purse allocation shall be as 18            follows: 50% to purses at the track where the 19            races wagered on are being conducted; 50% to 20            purses at the track where the inter-track wagering 21            licensee is accepting such wagers.22                (iii) If the inter-track wagering is being 23            conducted by an inter-track wagering location 24            licensee, except an inter-track wagering location 25            licensee that derives its license from an 26            organization licensee located in a county with a   HB5469- 39 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1            population in excess of 230,000 and bounded by the 2            Mississippi River, the entire purse allocation for 3            Illinois races shall be to purses at the track 4            where the race meeting being wagered on is being 5            held.6        (12) The Board shall have all powers necessary and 7    proper to fully supervise and control the conduct of 8    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering by inter-track 9    wagering licensees and inter-track wagering location 10    licensees, including, but not limited to, the following:11            (A) The Board is vested with power to promulgate 12        reasonable rules and regulations for the purpose of 13        administering the conduct of this wagering and to 14        prescribe reasonable rules, regulations and conditions 15        under which such wagering shall be held and conducted. 16        Such rules and regulations are to provide for the 17        prevention of practices detrimental to the public 18        interest and for the best interests of said wagering 19        and to impose penalties for violations thereof.20            (B) The Board, and any person or persons to whom it 21        delegates this power, is vested with the power to 22        enter the facilities of any licensee to determine 23        whether there has been compliance with the provisions 24        of this Act and the rules and regulations relating to 25        the conduct of such wagering.26            (C) The Board, and any person or persons to whom it   HB5469- 40 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        delegates this power, may eject or exclude from any 2        licensee's facilities, any person whose conduct or 3        reputation is such that his presence on such premises 4        may, in the opinion of the Board, call into the 5        question the honesty and integrity of, or interfere 6        with the orderly conduct of such wagering; provided, 7        however, that no person shall be excluded or ejected 8        from such premises solely on the grounds of race, 9        color, creed, national origin, ancestry, or sex.10            (D) (Blank).11            (E) The Board is vested with the power to appoint 12        delegates to execute any of the powers granted to it 13        under this Section for the purpose of administering 14        this wagering and any rules and regulations 15        promulgated in accordance with this Act.16            (F) The Board shall name and appoint a State 17        director of this wagering who shall be a 18        representative of the Board and whose duty it shall be 19        to supervise the conduct of inter-track wagering as 20        may be provided for by the rules and regulations of the 21        Board; such rules and regulation shall specify the 22        method of appointment and the Director's powers, 23        authority and duties. The Board may appoint the 24        Director of Mutuels to also serve as the State 25        director of this wagering. 26            (G) The Board is vested with the power to impose   HB5469- 41 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        civil penalties of up to $5,000 against individuals 2        and up to $10,000 against licensees for each violation 3        of any provision of this Act relating to the conduct of 4        this wagering, any rules adopted by the Board, any 5        order of the Board or any other action which in the 6        Board's discretion, is a detriment or impediment to 7        such wagering.8        (13) The Department of Agriculture may enter into 9    agreements with licensees authorizing such licensees to 10    conduct inter-track wagering on races to be held at the 11    licensed race meetings conducted by the Department of 12    Agriculture. Such agreement shall specify the races of the 13    Department of Agriculture's licensed race meeting upon 14    which the licensees will conduct wagering. In the event 15    that a licensee conducts inter-track pari-mutuel wagering 16    on races from the Illinois State Fair or DuQuoin State 17    Fair which are in addition to the licensee's previously 18    approved racing program, those races shall be considered a 19    separate racing day for the purpose of determining the 20    daily handle and computing the privilege or pari-mutuel 21    tax on that daily handle as provided in Sections 27 and 22    27.1. Such agreements shall be approved by the Board 23    before such wagering may be conducted. In determining 24    whether to grant approval, the Board shall give due 25    consideration to the best interests of the public and of 26    horse racing. The provisions of paragraphs (1), (8),   HB5469- 42 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    (8.1), and (8.2) of subsection (h) of this Section which 2    are not specified in this paragraph (13) shall not apply 3    to licensed race meetings conducted by the Department of 4    Agriculture at the Illinois State Fair in Sangamon County 5    or the DuQuoin State Fair in Perry County, or to any 6    wagering conducted on those race meetings.7        (14) An inter-track wagering location license 8    authorized by the Board in 2016 that is owned and operated 9    by a race track in Rock Island County shall be transferred 10    to a commonly owned race track in Cook County on August 12, 11    2016 (the effective date of Public Act 99-757). The 12    licensee shall retain its status in relation to purse 13    distribution under paragraph (11) of this subsection (h) 14    following the transfer to the new entity. The pari-mutuel 15    tax credit under Section 32.1 shall not be applied toward 16    any pari-mutuel tax obligation of the inter-track wagering 17    location licensee of the license that is transferred under 18    this paragraph (14).19    (i) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Act, the 20conduct of wagering at wagering facilities is authorized on 21all days, except as limited by subsection (b) of Section 19 of 22this Act.23(Source: P.A. 104-185, eff. 8-15-25.) 24    (230 ILCS 5/31.1)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-31.1)25    Sec. 31.1. (a) Unless subsection (a-5) applies,   HB5469- 43 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1organization licensee's racetracks, except racetracks owned by 2the State, licensees collectively shall contribute annually to 3charity the sum of $750,000 to non-profit organizations that 4provide medical and family, counseling, and similar services 5to persons who reside or work on the backstretch of Illinois 6racetracks. Unless subsection (a-5) applies, these 7contributions shall be collected as follows: (i) no later than 8October 1 July 1st of each year the contributions due shall be 9assessed equally by the Board for each racetrack, except 10racetracks owned by the State, at which an organization 11license or organization gaming license is awarded for the 12subsequent year; shall assess each organization licensee, 13except those tracks located in Madison County, which tracks 14shall pay $30,000 annually apiece into the Board charity fund, 15that amount which equals $690,000 multiplied by the amount of 16pari-mutuel wagering handled by the organization licensee in 17the year preceding assessment and divided by the total 18pari-mutuel wagering handled by all Illinois organization 19licensees, except those tracks located in Madison and Rock 20Island counties, in the year preceding assessment; (ii) notice 21of the assessed contribution shall be mailed to each 22organization licensee; (iii) within thirty days of its receipt 23of such notice, each organization licensee shall remit the 24assessed contribution to the Board. Unless subsection (a-5) 25applies, if an organization licensee commences operation of 26gaming at its facility pursuant to an organization gaming   HB5469- 44 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1license under the Illinois Gambling Act, then the organization 2licensee shall contribute an additional $83,000 per year 3beginning in the year subsequent to the first year in which the 4organization licensee begins receiving funds from gaming 5pursuant to an organization gaming license. If an organization 6licensee wilfully fails to so remit the contribution, the 7Board may revoke its license to conduct horse racing.8    (a-5) If (1) an organization licensee that did not operate 9live racing in 2017 is awarded racing dates in 2018 or in any 10subsequent year and (2) all organization licensees are 11operating gaming pursuant to an organization gaming license 12under the Illinois Gambling Act, then subsection (a) does not 13apply and organization licensees collectively shall contribute 14annually to charity the sum of $1,000,000 to non-profit 15organizations that provide medical and family, counseling, and 16similar services to persons who reside or work on the 17backstretch of Illinois racetracks. These contributions shall 18be collected as follows: (i) no later than October 1 July 1st 19of each year the contributions due shall be assessed equally 20by the Board for each racetrack, except racetracks owned by 21the State, at which an organization license or organization 22gaming license is awarded for the subsequent year; shall 23assess each organization licensee an amount based on the 24proportionate amount of live racing days in the calendar year 25for which the Board has awarded to the organization licensee 26out of the total aggregate number of live racing days awarded;   HB5469- 45 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1(ii) notice of the assessed contribution shall be mailed to 2each organization licensee; (iii) within 30 days after its 3receipt of such notice, each organization licensee shall remit 4the assessed contribution to the Board. If an organization 5licensee willfully fails to so remit the contribution, the 6Board may revoke its license to conduct horse racing. 7    (b) No later than October 1st of each year, any qualified 8charitable organization seeking an allotment of contributed 9funds shall submit to the Board an application for those 10funds, using the Board's approved form. The Board shall 11distribute all such amounts collected that year to such 12charitable organization applicants on a schedule determined by 13the Board, based on the charitable organization's estimated 14expenditures related to this grant. Any funds not expended by 15the grantee in a grant year shall be distributed to the 16charitable organization or charitable organizations selected 17in the next grant year after the funds are recovered in 18addition to the amounts specified in subsections (a) and 19(a-5). 20(Source: P.A. 104-185, eff. 8-15-25.) 21    (230 ILCS 5/32.1)22    Sec. 32.1. Pari-mutuel tax credit; statewide racetrack 23real estate equalization. 24    (a) In order to encourage new investment in Illinois 25racetrack facilities and mitigate differing real estate tax   HB5469- 46 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1burdens among all racetracks, the licensees affiliated or 2associated with each racetrack that has been awarded live 3racing dates in the current year shall receive an immediate 4pari-mutuel tax credit in an amount equal to the greater of (i) 550% of the amount of the real estate taxes paid in the prior 6year attributable to that racetrack, or (ii) the amount by 7which the real estate taxes paid in the prior year 8attributable to that racetrack exceeds 60% of the average real 9estate taxes paid in the prior year for all racetracks awarded 10live horse racing meets in the current year.11    Each year, regardless of whether the organization licensee 12conducted live racing in the year of certification, the Board 13shall certify in writing, prior to December 31, the real 14estate taxes paid in that year for each racetrack and the 15amount of the pari-mutuel tax credit that each organization 16licensee, inter-track wagering licensee, and inter-track 17wagering location licensee that derives its license from such 18racetrack is entitled in the succeeding calendar year. The 19real estate taxes considered under this Section for any 20racetrack shall be those taxes on the real estate parcels and 21related facilities used to conduct a horse race meeting and 22inter-track wagering at such racetrack under this Act. In no 23event shall the amount of the tax credit under this Section 24exceed the amount of pari-mutuel taxes otherwise calculated 25under this Act. The amount of the tax credit under this Section 26shall be retained by each licensee and shall not be subject to   HB5469- 47 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1any reallocation or further distribution under this Act. The 2Board may promulgate emergency rules to implement this 3Section.4    (b) If the organization licensee is operating gaming 5pursuant to an organization gaming license issued under the 6Illinois Gambling Act, except the organization licensee 7described in Section 19.5, then, for the 10-year 5-year period 8beginning on the January 1 of the calendar year immediately 9following the calendar year during which an organization 10licensee begins conducting gaming operations pursuant to an 11organization gaming license issued under the Illinois Gambling 12Act, the organization licensee shall make capital 13expenditures, in an amount equal to no less than 50% of the tax 14credit under this Section, to the improvement and maintenance 15of the backstretch, including, but not limited to, backstretch 16barns, dormitories, and services for backstretch workers. 17Those capital expenditures must be in addition to, and not in 18lieu of, the capital expenditures made for backstretch 19improvements in calendar year 2015, as reported to the Board 20in the organization licensee's application for racing dates 21and as certified by the Board. The organization licensee is 22required to annually submit the list and amounts of these 23capital expenditures to the Board by January 30th of the year 24following the expenditure. 25    (c) If the organization licensee is conducting gaming in 26accordance with paragraph (b), then, after the 10-year 5-year   HB5469- 48 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1period beginning on January 1 of the calendar year immediately 2following the calendar year during which an organization 3licensee begins conducting gaming operations pursuant to an 4organization gaming license issued under the Illinois Gambling 5Act, the organization license is ineligible to receive a tax 6credit under this Section.7(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17; 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 8    Section 10. The Illinois Gambling Act is amended by 9changing Section 7.7 as follows: 10    (230 ILCS 10/7.7)11    Sec. 7.7. Organization gaming licenses.12    (a) The Illinois Gaming Board shall award one organization 13gaming license to each person or entity having operating 14control of a racetrack that applies under Section 56 of the 15Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975, subject to the application 16and eligibility requirements of this Section. Within 60 days 17after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st 18General Assembly, a person or entity having operating control 19of a racetrack may submit an application for an organization 20gaming license. The application shall be made on such forms as 21provided by the Board and shall contain such information as 22the Board prescribes, including, but not limited to, the 23identity of any racetrack at which gaming will be conducted 24pursuant to an organization gaming license, detailed   HB5469- 49 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1information regarding the ownership and management of the 2applicant, and detailed personal information regarding the 3applicant. The application shall specify the number of gaming 4positions the applicant intends to use and the place where the 5organization gaming facility will operate. A person who 6knowingly makes a false statement on an application is guilty 7of a Class A misdemeanor.8    Each applicant shall disclose the identity of every person 9or entity having a direct or indirect pecuniary interest 10greater than 1% in any racetrack with respect to which the 11license is sought. If the disclosed entity is a corporation, 12the applicant shall disclose the names and addresses of all 13officers, stockholders, and directors. If the disclosed entity 14is a limited liability company, the applicant shall disclose 15the names and addresses of all members and managers. If the 16disclosed entity is a partnership, the applicant shall 17disclose the names and addresses of all partners, both general 18and limited. If the disclosed entity is a trust, the applicant 19shall disclose the names and addresses of all beneficiaries.20    An application shall be filed and considered in accordance 21with the rules of the Board. Each application for an 22organization gaming license shall include a nonrefundable 23application fee of $250,000. In addition, a nonrefundable fee 24of $50,000 shall be paid at the time of filing to defray the 25costs associated with background investigations conducted by 26the Board. If the costs of the background investigation exceed   HB5469- 50 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1$50,000, the applicant shall pay the additional amount to the 2Board within 7 days after a request by the Board. If the costs 3of the investigation are less than $50,000, the applicant 4shall receive a refund of the remaining amount. All 5information, records, interviews, reports, statements, 6memoranda, or other data supplied to or used by the Board in 7the course of this review or investigation of an applicant for 8an organization gaming license under this Act shall be 9privileged and strictly confidential and shall be used only 10for the purpose of evaluating an applicant for an organization 11gaming license or a renewal. Such information, records, 12interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data 13shall not be admissible as evidence nor discoverable in any 14action of any kind in any court or before any tribunal, board, 15agency or person, except for any action deemed necessary by 16the Board. The application fee shall be deposited into the 17State Gaming Fund.18    Any applicant or key person, including the applicant's 19owners, officers, directors (if a corporation), managers and 20members (if a limited liability company), and partners (if a 21partnership), for an organization gaming license shall submit 22with his or her application, on forms provided by the Board, 2 23sets of fingerprints. The board shall charge each applicant a 24fee set by the Illinois State Police to defray the costs 25associated with the search and classification of fingerprints 26obtained by the Board with respect to the applicant's   HB5469- 51 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1application. The fees shall be deposited into the State Police 2Services Fund. 3    (b) The Board shall determine within 120 days after 4receiving an application for an organization gaming license 5whether to grant an organization gaming license to the 6applicant. If the Board does not make a determination within 7that time period, then the Board shall give a written 8explanation to the applicant as to why it has not reached a 9determination and when it reasonably expects to make a 10determination.11    The organization gaming licensee shall purchase up to the 12amount of gaming positions authorized under this Act within 13120 days after receiving its organization gaming license. If 14an organization gaming licensee is prepared to purchase the 15gaming positions, but is temporarily prohibited from doing so 16by order of a court of competent jurisdiction or the Board, 17then the 120-day period is tolled until a resolution is 18reached.19    An organization gaming license shall authorize its holder 20to conduct gaming under this Act at its racetracks on the same 21days of the year and hours of the day that owners licenses are 22allowed to operate under approval of the Board. 23    An organization gaming license and any renewal of an 24organization gaming license shall authorize gaming pursuant to 25this Section for a period of 4 years. The fee for the issuance 26or renewal of an organization gaming license shall be   HB5469- 52 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1$250,000.2    All payments by licensees under this subsection (b) shall 3be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. 4    (c) To be eligible to conduct gaming under this Section, a 5person or entity having operating control of a racetrack must 6(i) obtain an organization gaming license, (ii) hold an 7organization license under the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 81975, (iii) hold an inter-track wagering license, (iv) pay an 9initial fee of $17,500 $30,000 per gaming position from 10organization gaming licensees where gaming is conducted in 11Cook County and, except as provided in subsection (c-5), 12$17,500 for organization gaming licensees where gaming is 13conducted outside of Cook County before beginning to conduct 14gaming plus make the reconciliation payment required under 15subsection (k), (v) conduct live racing in accordance with 16subsections (e-1), (e-2), and (e-3) of Section 20 of the 17Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975, (vi) meet the requirements 18of subsection (a) of Section 56 of the Illinois Horse Racing 19Act of 1975, (vii) for organization licensees conducting 20standardbred race meetings, keep backstretch barns and 21dormitories open and operational year-round unless a lesser 22schedule is mutually agreed to by the organization licensee 23and the horsemen association racing at that organization 24licensee's race meeting, (viii) for organization licensees 25conducting thoroughbred race meetings, the organization 26licensee must maintain accident medical expense liability   HB5469- 53 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1insurance coverage of $1,000,000 for jockeys, and (ix) meet 2all other requirements of this Act that apply to owners 3licensees.4    An organization gaming licensee may enter into a joint 5venture with a licensed owner to own, manage, conduct, or 6otherwise operate the organization gaming licensee's 7organization gaming facilities, unless the organization gaming 8licensee has a parent company or other affiliated company that 9is, directly or indirectly, wholly owned by a parent company 10that is also licensed to conduct organization gaming, casino 11gaming, or their equivalent in another state. 12    All payments by licensees under this subsection (c) shall 13be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. 14    (c-5) A person or entity having operating control of a 15racetrack located in Madison County shall only pay the initial 16fees specified in subsection (c) for 540 of the gaming 17positions authorized under the license. A person or entity 18having operating control of a racetrack located in Cook County 19shall only pay the initial fees specified in subsection (c) 20for 720 of the gaming positions authorized under the license. 21    (d) A person or entity is ineligible to receive an 22organization gaming license if:23        (1) the person or entity has been convicted of a 24    felony under the laws of this State, any other state, or 25    the United States, including a conviction under the 26    Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act;  HB5469- 54 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1        (2) the person or entity has been convicted of any 2    violation of Article 28 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or 3    substantially similar laws of any other jurisdiction;4        (3) the person or entity has submitted an application 5    for a license under this Act that contains false 6    information;7        (4) the person is a member of the Board;8        (5) a person defined in (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this 9    subsection (d) is an officer, director, or managerial 10    employee of the entity;11        (6) the person or entity employs a person defined in 12    (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this subsection (d) who 13    participates in the management or operation of gambling 14    operations authorized under this Act; or15        (7) a license of the person or entity issued under 16    this Act or a license to own or operate gambling 17    facilities in any other jurisdiction has been revoked. 18    (e) The Board may approve gaming positions pursuant to an 19organization gaming license statewide as provided in this 20Section. The authority to operate gaming positions under this 21Section shall be allocated as follows: up to 1,200 gaming 22positions for any organization gaming licensee in Cook County 23and up to 900 gaming positions for any organization gaming 24licensee outside of Cook County.25    (f) Each applicant for an organization gaming license 26shall specify in its application for licensure the number of   HB5469- 55 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1gaming positions it will operate, up to the applicable 2limitation set forth in subsection (e) of this Section. Any 3unreserved gaming positions that are not specified shall be 4forfeited and retained by the Board. For the purposes of this 5subsection (f), an organization gaming licensee that did not 6conduct live racing in 2010 and is located within 3 miles of 7the Mississippi River may reserve up to 900 positions and 8shall not be penalized under this Section for not operating 9those positions until it meets the requirements of subsection 10(e) of this Section, but such licensee shall not request 11unreserved gaming positions under this subsection (f) until 12its 900 positions are all operational. 13    Thereafter, the Board shall publish the number of 14unreserved gaming positions and shall accept requests for 15additional positions from any organization gaming licensee 16that initially reserved all of the positions that were 17offered. The Board shall allocate expeditiously the unreserved 18gaming positions to requesting organization gaming licensees 19in a manner that maximizes revenue to the State. The Board may 20allocate any such unused gaming positions pursuant to an open 21and competitive bidding process, as provided under Section 7.5 22of this Act. This process shall continue until all unreserved 23gaming positions have been purchased. All positions obtained 24pursuant to this process and all positions the organization 25gaming licensee specified it would operate in its application 26must be in operation within 18 months after they were obtained   HB5469- 56 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1or the organization gaming licensee forfeits the right to 2operate those positions, but is not entitled to a refund of any 3fees paid. The Board may, after holding a public hearing, 4grant extensions so long as the organization gaming licensee 5is working in good faith to make the positions operational. 6The extension may be for a period of 6 months. If, after the 7period of the extension, the organization gaming licensee has 8not made the positions operational, then another public 9hearing must be held by the Board before it may grant another 10extension. 11    Unreserved gaming positions retained from and allocated to 12organization gaming licensees by the Board pursuant to this 13subsection (f) shall not be allocated to owners licensees 14under this Act. 15    For the purpose of this subsection (f), the unreserved 16gaming positions for each organization gaming licensee shall 17be the applicable limitation set forth in subsection (e) of 18this Section, less the number of reserved gaming positions by 19such organization gaming licensee, and the total unreserved 20gaming positions shall be the aggregate of the unreserved 21gaming positions for all organization gaming licensees. 22    (g) An organization gaming licensee is authorized to 23conduct the following at a racetrack:24        (1) slot machine gambling;25        (2) video game of chance gambling;26        (3) gambling with electronic gambling games as defined   HB5469- 57 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1    in this Act or defined by the Illinois Gaming Board; and2        (4) table games. 3    (h) Subject to the approval of the Illinois Gaming Board, 4an organization gaming licensee may make modification or 5additions to any existing buildings and structures to comply 6with the requirements of this Act. The Illinois Gaming Board 7shall make its decision after consulting with the Illinois 8Racing Board. In no case, however, shall the Illinois Gaming 9Board approve any modification or addition that alters the 10grounds of the organization licensee such that the act of live 11racing is an ancillary activity to gaming authorized under 12this Section. Gaming authorized under this Section may take 13place in existing structures where inter-track wagering is 14conducted at the racetrack or a facility within 300 yards of 15the racetrack in accordance with the provisions of this Act 16and the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975.17    (i) An organization gaming licensee may conduct gaming at 18a temporary facility pending the construction of a permanent 19facility or the remodeling or relocation of an existing 20facility to accommodate gaming participants for up to 24 21months after the temporary facility begins to conduct gaming 22authorized under this Section. Upon request by an organization 23gaming licensee and upon a showing of good cause by the 24organization gaming licensee, the Board shall extend the 25period during which the licensee may conduct gaming authorized 26under this Section at a temporary facility by up to 12 months.   HB5469- 58 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1The Board shall make rules concerning the conduct of gaming 2authorized under this Section from temporary facilities.3    The gaming authorized under this Section may take place in 4existing structures where inter-track wagering is conducted at 5the racetrack or a facility within 300 yards of the racetrack 6in accordance with the provisions of this Act and the Illinois 7Horse Racing Act of 1975.8    (i-5) Under no circumstances shall an organization gaming 9licensee conduct gaming at any State or county fair. 10    (j) The Illinois Gaming Board must adopt emergency rules 11in accordance with Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative 12Procedure Act as necessary to ensure compliance with the 13provisions of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 14Assembly concerning the conduct of gaming by an organization 15gaming licensee. The adoption of emergency rules authorized by 16this subsection (j) shall be deemed to be necessary for the 17public interest, safety, and welfare.18    (k) Each organization gaming licensee who obtains gaming 19positions must make a reconciliation payment 3 years after the 20date the organization gaming licensee begins operating the 21positions in an amount equal to 75% of the difference between 22its adjusted gross receipts from gaming authorized under this 23Section and amounts paid to its purse accounts pursuant to 24item (1) of subsection (b) of Section 56 of the Illinois Horse 25Racing Act of 1975 for the 12-month period for which such 26difference was the largest, minus an amount equal to the   HB5469- 59 -LRB104 18730 LNS 32173 b1initial per position fee paid by the organization gaming 2licensee. If this calculation results in a negative amount, 3then the organization gaming licensee is not entitled to any 4reimbursement of fees previously paid. This reconciliation 5payment may be made in installments over a period of no more 6than 12 6 years.7    All payments by licensees under this subsection (k) shall 8be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. 9    (l) As soon as practical after a request is made by the 10Illinois Gaming Board, to minimize duplicate submissions by 11the applicant, the Illinois Racing Board must provide 12information on an applicant for an organization gaming license 13to the Illinois Gaming Board.14(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.)